Georgia, session 2025_26, HB36.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
11 SECTION 1.
12 Title 29 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to guardian and ward, is
13 amended by revising paragraph (10) of Code Section 29-1-1, relating to definitions, as
14 follows:
15 "(10) 'Licensed clinical social worker' means a social worker who is licensed as such in
16 accordance with the provisions of Chapter 10A of Title 43."
- 1 -

25 LC 44 3193ERS
17 SECTION 2.
18 Said title is further amended in Code Section 29-4-1, relating to prerequisite findings prior
19 to appointment of guardian for adult and extent of guardianship, by adding a new paragraph
20 to subsection (e) to read as follows:
21 "(3) An adult shall not be presumed to be in need of a guardian solely because of a
22 finding that the adult has one or more developmental disabilities as defined in
23 paragraph (8) of Code Section 37-1-1."
24 SECTION 3.
25 Said title is further amended in Code Section 29-4-10, relating to petition for appointment
26 of guardian and requirements for petition, by revising paragraph (1) of subsection (c) as
27 follows:
28 "(c)(1) The petition shall be sworn to by two or more petitioners or shall be supported
29 by an affidavit of a physician licensed to practice medicine under Chapter 34 of Title 43,
30 a psychologist licensed to practice under Chapter 39 of Title 43, a physician assistant
31 licensed under Chapter 34 of Title 43, a nurse practitioner or clinical nurse specialist in
32 psychiatric/mental health licensed or registered under Chapter 26 of Title 43, a marriage
33 and family therapist or professional counselor licensed under Chapter 10A of Title 43,
34 or a licensed clinical social worker, or, if the proposed ward is a patient in any federal
35 medical facility in which such a physician, psychologist, or physician assistant, nurse
36 practitioner, clinical nurse specialist in psychiatric/mental health, marriage and family
37 therapist, professional counselor, or licensed clinical social worker is not available, a
38 physician, psychologist, or physician assistant, nurse practitioner, clinical nurse specialist
39 in psychiatric/mental health, marriage and family therapist, professional counselor, or
40 licensed clinical social worker who is authorized to practice in that such federal facility."
- 2 -

25 LC 44 3193ERS
41 SECTION 4.
42 Said title is further amended in Code Section 29-4-11, relating to prerequisite judicial finding
43 of probable cause, notice, petition, evaluations, and reporting requirements for appointment
44 for guardians for adults, by revising subsection (d) as follows:
45 "(d)(1) If the petition is not dismissed under pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code
46 section, the court shall appoint an evaluating physician evaluator who shall be a physician
47 licensed to practice medicine under Chapter 34 of Title 43, a psychologist licensed to
48 practice under Chapter 39 of Title 43, a physician assistant licensed under Chapter 34 of
49 Title 43, a nurse practitioner or clinical nurse specialist in psychiatric/mental health
50 licensed or registered under Chapter 26 of Title 43, a marriage and family therapist or
51 professional counselor licensed under Chapter 10A of Title 43, or a licensed clinical
52 social worker, or, if the proposed ward is a patient in any federal medical facility in which
53 such a physician, psychologist, or physician assistant, nurse practitioner, clinical nurse
54 specialist in psychiatric/mental health, marriage and family therapist, professional
55 counselor, or licensed clinical social worker is not available, a physician, psychologist,
56 or physician assistant, nurse practitioner, clinical nurse specialist in psychiatric/mental
57 health, marriage and family therapist, professional counselor, or licensed clinical social
58 worker who is authorized to practice in that such federal facility, other than the physician,
59 psychologist, or physician assistant, nurse practitioner, clinical nurse specialist in
60 psychiatric/mental health, marriage and family therapist, professional counselor, or
61 licensed clinical social worker who completed the affidavit attached to the petition
62 pursuant to subsection (c) of Code Section 29-4-10.
63 (2) When evaluating the proposed ward, the physician, psychologist, or physician
64 assistant, nurse practitioner, clinical nurse specialist in psychiatric/mental health,
65 marriage and family therapist, professional counselor, or licensed clinical social worker
66 shall explain the purpose of the evaluation to the proposed ward. The proposed ward may
67 remain silent. Any statements made by the proposed ward during the evaluation shall be
- 3 -

25 LC 44 3193ERS
68 privileged and shall be inadmissable as evidence in any proceeding other than a
69 proceeding under this chapter. The proposed ward's legal counsel shall have the right to
70 be present but shall not participate in the evaluation.
71 (3) The evaluation shall be conducted with as little interference with the proposed ward's
72 activities as possible. The evaluation shall take place at the place and time set in the
73 notice to the proposed ward and the his or her legal counsel and the time set shall not be
74 sooner than the fifth day after the service of notice on the proposed ward. The court,
75 however, shall have the exclusive power to change the place and time of the examination
76 at any time upon reasonable notice being given to the proposed ward and to his or her
77 legal counsel. If the proposed ward fails to appear, the court may order that the proposed
78 ward be taken directly to and from a medical facility or the office of the physician,
79 psychologist, or physician assistant, nurse practitioner, clinical nurse specialist in
80 psychiatric/mental health, marriage and family therapist, professional counselor, or
81 licensed clinical social worker for purposes of evaluation only. The evaluation shall be
82 conducted during the normal business hours of the facility or office and the proposed
83 ward shall not be detained in the facility or office overnight. The evaluation may include,
84 but not be limited to:
85 (A) A self-report from the proposed ward, if possible;
86 (B) Questions and observations of the proposed ward to assess the functional abilities
87 of the proposed ward;
88 (C) A review of the records for the proposed ward, including, but not limited to,
89 medical records, medication charts, and other available records;
90 (D) An assessment of cultural factors and language barriers that may impact the
91 proposed ward's abilities and living environment; and
92 (E) All other factors the evaluator determines to be appropriate to the evaluation.
93 (4) A written report shall be filed with the court no later than seven days after the
94 evaluation, and the court shall serve a copy of the report by first-class mail upon the
- 4 -

25 LC 44 3193ERS
95 proposed ward and the proposed ward's legal counsel and, if any, the guardian ad litem
96 if appointed.
97 (5) The report shall be signed under oath by the physician, psychologist, or licensed
98 clinical social worker evaluator and shall:
99 (A) State the circumstances and duration of the evaluation, including a summary of
100 questions or tests utilized, and the elements of the evaluation;
101 (B) List all persons and other sources of information consulted in evaluating the
102 proposed ward;
103 (C) Describe the proposed ward's mental and physical state and condition, including
104 all observed facts considered by the physician or psychologist or licensed clinical social
105 worker evaluator;
106 (D) Describe the overall social condition of the proposed ward, including support, care,
107 education, and well-being; and
108 (E) Describe the needs of the proposed ward and their foreseeable duration.
109 (6) The proposed ward's legal counsel may file a written response to the evaluation,
110 provided the response is filed no later than the date of the commencement of the hearing
111 on the petition for guardianship. The response may include, but is not limited to,
112 independent evaluations, affidavits of individuals with personal knowledge of the
113 proposed ward, and a statement of applicable law. In the response, the proposed ward's
114 legal counsel may also challenge the sufficiency and weight of the results and
115 conclusions of the evaluation and written report and the qualifications, experience, or
116 abilities of the person performing the evaluation."
117 SECTION 5.
118 Said title is further amended in Code Section 29-4-12, relating to judicial review of pleadings
119 and evaluation report, findings, and hearing, by revising subsection (d) as follows:
- 5 -

25 LC 44 3193ERS
120 "(d)(1) The hearing shall be held in a courtroom or, for good cause shown, at such other
121 place as the court may choose. At the request of the proposed ward or the proposed
122 ward's legal counsel and for good cause shown, the court may exercise its discretion to
123 exclude the public from the hearing and the record shall reflect the court's action. The
124 proposed ward or the proposed ward's legal counsel may waive the appearance of the
125 proposed ward at the hearing.
126 (2) The hearing shall be recorded by either a certified court reporter or a sound-recording
127 device. The recording shall be retained for not less than 45 days from the date of the
128 entry of the order described in Code Section 29-4-13.
129 (3) The court shall apply the rules of evidence applicable in civil cases.
130 (4) At the hearing, the proposed ward may also challenge, by appropriate evidence and
131 argument, the sufficiency and weight of the results and conclusions of the evaluation and
132 written report and the qualifications, experience, or abilities of the person performing the
133 evaluation. The proposed ward shall have the right to present such evidence and
134 argument regardless of whether the proposed ward's legal counsel raised such matters in
135 a written response submitted by the proposed ward's legal counsel pursuant to
136 paragraph (6) of subsection (d) of Code Section 29-4-11.
137 (5) The court shall utilize the criteria in Code Section 29-4-1 to determine whether there
138 is clear and convincing evidence of the need for a guardianship in light of the evidence
139 taken at the hearing. In addition, the court may consider the evaluation report and any
140 response filed or argument and evidence presented by the proposed ward. The burden
141 of proof shall be upon the petitioner.
142 (6) If the court finds that the proposed ward has one or more developmental disabilities
143 as defined in paragraph (8) of Code Section 37-1-1, the court shall not find that there is
144 a need for a guardianship unless the evidence shows by clear and convincing evidence
145 that, due to such developmental disability or disabilities and other factors that may be
- 6 -

25 LC 44 3193ERS
146 present, the proposed ward lacks sufficient capacity to make or communicate significant
147 responsible decisions concerning his or her health or safety.
148 (5)(7) Upon determination of the need for a guardianship, the court shall determine the
149 powers, if any, which are to be retained by the proposed ward, in accordance with the
150 provisions of Code Section 29-4-21 and whether any additional powers are to be granted
151 to the guardian, pursuant to the provisions of subsection (b) of Code Section 29-4-23.
152 (6)(8) If the court determines that a guardianship is necessary and the proposed ward is
153 present, the proposed ward may suggest any individual as guardian. The court shall
154 select as guardian the individual who will serve the best interest of the ward.
155 (7)(9) In any procedure under this chapter in which the judge of the court is unable to
156 hear a case within the time required for such hearing, the judge shall appoint an
157 individual to hear the case and exercise all the jurisdiction of the court in the case. Any
158 individual appointed shall be a member of the State Bar of Georgia who is qualified to
159 serve as the probate judge in that county and who is, in the opinion of the appointing
160 judge, qualified for the duties by training and experience. The appointment may be made
161 on a case-by-case basis or by making a standing appointment of one or more individuals.
162 Any individual who receives a standing appointment shall serve at the pleasure of the
163 judge who makes the appointment or the judge's successor in office. The compensation
164 of an individual appointed shall be as agreed upon by the judge who makes the
165 appointment and the individual appointed, with the approval of the governing authority
166 of the county for which the individual is appointed, and shall be paid from county funds.
167 All fees collected for the service of the appointed individual shall be paid into the general
168 funds of the county."
- 7 -

25 LC 44 3193ERS
169 SECTION 6.
170 Said title is further amended in Code Section 29-4-14, relating to petition for appointment
171 of emergency guardian of an adult and requirements of petition, by revising paragraph (1)
172 of subsection (d) as follows:
173 "(d)(1) The petition shall be sworn to by two or more petitioners or shall be supported
174 by an affidavit of a physician licensed to practice medicine under Chapter 34 of Title 43,
175 a psychologist licensed to practice under Chapter 39 of Title 43, a physician assistant
176 licensed under Chapter 34 of Title 43, a nurse practitioner or clinical nurse specialist in
177 psychiatric/mental health licensed or registered under Chapter 26 of Title 43, a marriage
178 and family therapist or professional counselor licensed under Chapter 10A of Title 43,
179 or a licensed clinical social worker, or, if the proposed ward is a patient in any federal
180 medical facility in which such a physician, psychologist, or physician assistant, nurse
181 practitioner, clinical nurse specialist in psychiatric/mental health, marriage and family
182 therapist, professional counselor, or licensed clinical social worker is not available, a
183 physician, psychologist, or physician assistant, nurse practitioner, clinical nurse specialist
184 in psychiatric/mental health, marriage and family therapist, professional counselor, or
185 licensed clinical social worker authorized to practice in that such federal facility."
186 SECTION 7.
187 Said title is further amended in Code Section 29-4-15, relating to prerequisite findings prior
188 to appointment of emergency guardian, evaluation, notice, and hearing, by revising
189 subsection (c) as follows:
190 "(c) If the court determines that there is probable cause to believe that the proposed ward
191 is in need of an emergency guardian, the court shall:
192 (1) Immediately appoint legal counsel to represent the proposed ward at the emergency
193 hearing, which counsel may be the same counsel who is appointed to represent the
- 8 -

25 LC 44 3193ERS
194 proposed ward in the hearing on the petition for guardianship or conservatorship, if any
195 such petition has been filed, and shall inform counsel of the appointment;
196 (2) Order an emergency hearing to be conducted not sooner than three days nor later than
197 five days after the filing of the petition;
198 (3) Order an evaluation of the proposed ward by a physician an evaluator who shall be
199 a physician licensed to practice medicine under Chapter 34 of Title 43, a psychologist
200 licensed to practice under Chapter 39 of Title 43, a physician assistant licensed under
201 Chapter 34 of Title 43, a nurse practitioner or clinical nurse specialist in
202 psychiatric/mental health licensed or registered under Chapter 26 of Title 43, a marriage
203 and family therapist or professional counselor licensed under Chapter 10A of Title 43,
204 or a licensed clinical social worker, other than the physician, psychologist, or physician
205 assistant, nurse practitioner, clinical nurse specialist in psychiatric/mental health,
206 marriage and family therapist, professional counselor, or licensed clinical social worker
207 who completed the affidavit attached to the petition pursuant to paragraph (1) of
208 subsection (d) of Code Section 29-4-10. The evaluation shall be conducted within 72
209 hours of the time the order was issued and a written report shall be furnished to the court
210 and made available to the parties within this time frame, which evaluation and report
211 shall be governed by the provisions of subsection (d) of Code Section 29-4-11;
212 (4) Immediately notify the proposed ward of the proceedings by service of all pleadings
213 on the proposed ward, which notice shall:
214 (A) Be served personally on the proposed ward by an officer of the court and shall not
215 be served by mail;
216 (B) Inform the proposed ward that a petition has been filed to have an emergency
217 guardian appointed for the proposed ward, that the proposed ward has the right to attend
218 any hearing that is held, and that, if an emergency guardian is appointed, the proposed
219 ward may lose important rights to control the management of the proposed ward's
220 person;
- 9 -

25 LC 44 3193ERS
221 (C) Inform the proposed ward of the place and time at which the proposed ward shall
222 submit to the evaluation provided for by paragraph (3) of this subsection;
223 (D) Inform the proposed ward of the appointment of legal counsel; and
224 (E) Inform the proposed ward of the date and time of the hearing on the emergency
225 guardianship; and
226 (5) Appoint an emergency guardian to serve until the emergency hearing, with or without
227 prior notice to the proposed ward, if the threatened risk is so immediate and the potential
228 harm so irreparable that any delay is unreasonable and the existence of the threatened risk
229 and potential for irreparable harm is certified by the affidavit of a physician licensed to
230 practice medicine under Chapter 34 of Title 43, a psychologist licensed to practice under
231 Chapter 39 of Title 43, a physician assistant licensed under Chapter 34 of Title 43, a
232 nurse practitioner or clinical nurse specialist in psychiatric/mental health licensed or
233 registered under Chapter 26 of Title 43, a marriage and family therapist or professional
234 counselor licensed under Chapter 10A of Title 43, or a licensed clinical social worker.
235 Appointment of an emergency guardian under this paragraph is not a final determination
236 of the proposed ward's need for a nonemergency guardian. Any emergency guardian
237 appointed under this paragraph shall have only those powers and duties specifically
238 enumerated in the letters of emergency guardianship, and the powers and duties shall not
239 exceed those absolutely necessary to respond to the immediate threatened risk to the
240 ward."
241 SECTION 8.
242 Said title is further amended by revising Code Section 29-4-16, relating to conduct of
243 emergency guardianship hearing and limitations on emergency guardianship, as follows:
244 "29-4-16.
245 (a) The court shall conduct the emergency guardianship hearing, at the time and date set
246 forth in its order, to determine whether there is clear and convincing evidence of the need
- 10 -

25 LC 44 3193ERS
247 for an emergency guardianship in light of the evidence taken at the hearing. In addition to
248 the evidence at the hearing, the court may consider the evaluation report and any response
249 filed by the proposed ward. The proposed ward may also challenge, by appropriate
250 evidence and argument, the sufficiency and weight of the results and conclusions of the
251 evaluation and written report and the qualifications, experience, or abilities of the person
252 performing the evaluation. The burden of proof shall be upon the petitioner. Upon the
253 consent of the petitioner and the proposed ward, the court may grant a continuance of the
254 case for a period not to exceed 30 days.
255 (b) If the court at the emergency hearing finds that an emergency guardianship is
256 necessary, the court shall order the emergency guardianship; provided, however, that:
257 (1) Any emergency guardian shall have only those powers and duties specifically
258 enumerated in the letters of emergency guardianship and the powers and duties shall not
259 exceed those absolutely necessary to respond to the immediate threatened risk to the
260 ward;
261 (2) The court may order the emergency guardian to make any report the court requires;
262 (3) If the court finds that the proposed ward has one or more developmental disabilities
263 as defined in paragraph (8) of Code Section 37-1-1, the court shall not find that there is
264 a need for an emergency guardianship unless the evidence shows by clear and convincing
265 evidence that, due to such developmental disability or disabilities and other factors that
266 may be present, the proposed ward lacks sufficient capacity to make or communicate
267 significant responsible decisions concerning his or her health or safety and there is an
268 immediate and substantial risk of death or serious physical injury, illness, or disease
269 unless an emergency guardian is appointed; and
270 (3)(4) The emergency guardianship shall terminate on the earliest of:
271 (A) The court's removal of the emergency guardian, with or without cause;
272 (B) The effective date of the appointment of a guardian;
- 11 -

25 LC 44 3193ERS
273 (C) Unless otherwise specified in the order of dismissal, the dismissal of a petition for
274 appointment of a guardian;
275 (D) The date specified for the termination in the order appointing the emergency
276 guardian;
277 (E) Sixty days from the date of appointment of the emergency guardian, provided that
278 the court had jurisdiction to issue such order under paragraph (1) of Code
279 Section 29-11-12; or
280 (F) Ninety days from the date of appointment of the emergency guardian, provided that
281 the court had jurisdiction to issue such order under paragraph (2) or (3) of Code
282 Section 29-11-12."
283 SECTION 9.
284 Said title is further amended in Code Section 29-4-41, relating to modification of
285 guardianship, by revising subsection (b) as follows:
286 "(b) If the petition for modification alleges a significant change in the capacity of the ward,
287 it must be supported either by the affidavits of two persons who have knowledge of the
288 ward, one of whom may be the petitioner, or of a physician licensed to practice medicine
289 under Chapter 34 of Title 43, a psychologist licensed to practice under Chapter 39 of
290 Title 43, a physician assistant licensed under Chapter 34 of Title 43, a nurse practitioner
291 or clinical nurse specialist in psychiatric/mental health licensed or registered under
292 Chapter 26 of Title 43, a marriage and family therapist or professional counselor licensed
293 under Chapter 10A of Title 43, or a licensed clinical social worker, setting forth the
294 supporting facts and determinations. If, after reviewing the petition and the affidavits, the
295 court determines that there is no probable cause to believe that there has been a significant
296 change in the capacity of the ward, the court shall dismiss the petition. If the petition is not
297 dismissed, the court shall order that an evaluation be conducted, in accordance with the
298 provisions of subsection (d) of Code Section 29-4-11. If, after reviewing the evaluation
- 12 -

25 LC 44 3193ERS
299 report, the court finds that there is no probable cause to believe that there has been a
300 significant change in the capacity of the ward, the court shall dismiss the petition. If the
301 petition is not dismissed, the court shall schedule a hearing, with notice as the court deems
302 appropriate."
303 SECTION 10.
304 Said title is further amended in Code Section 29-4-42, relating to termination of
305 guardianship, required evidence, burden of proof, and return of property, by revising
306 subsection (b) as follows:
307 "(b) A petition for termination must be supported either by the affidavits of two persons
308 who have knowledge of the ward, one of whom may be the petitioner, or of a physician
309 licensed to practice medicine under Chapter 34 of Title 43, a psychologist licensed to
310 practice under Chapter 39 of Title 43, a physician assistant licensed under Chapter 34 of
311 Title 43, a nurse practitioner or clinical nurse specialist in psychiatric/mental health
312 licensed or registered under Chapter 26 of Title 43, a marriage and family therapist or
313 professional counselor licensed under Chapter 10A of Title 43, or a licensed clinical social
314 worker, setting forth the supporting facts and determinations. If, after reviewing the
315 petition and the affidavits, the court determines that there is no probable cause to believe
316 that the guardianship should be terminated, the court shall dismiss the petition. If the
317 petition is not dismissed, the court shall order that an evaluation be conducted, in
318 accordance with the provisions of subsection (d) of Code Section 29-4-11. If, after
319 reviewing the evaluation report, the court finds that there is no probable cause to believe
320 that the guardianship should be terminated, the court shall dismiss the petition. If the
321 petition is not dismissed, the court shall schedule a hearing, with such notice as the court
322 deems appropriate."
- 13 -

25 LC 44 3193ERS
323 SECTION 11.
324 Said title is further amended in Code Section 29-4-70, relating to right of ward to appeal,
325 procedure, and appointment of emergency guardian, by revising subsection (d) as follows:
326 "(d) Pending any appeal, the superior court or a probate court that is described in
327 paragraph (2) of Code Section 15-9-120 may appoint an emergency guardian with such
328 powers and duties as are described in Code Section 29-4-16; provided, however, that an
329 emergency guardian may be appointed only upon the filing of an affidavit of a physician
330 licensed to practice medicine under Chapter 34 of Title 43, a psychologist licensed to
331 practice under Chapter 39 of Title 43, a physician assistant licensed under Chapter 34 of
332 Title 43, a nurse practitioner or clinical nurse specialist in psychiatric/mental health
333 licensed or registered under Chapter 26 of Title 43, a marriage and family therapist or
334 professional counselor licensed under Chapter 10A of Title 43, or a licensed clinical social
335 worker, setting forth the existence of the emergency circumstances described in subsection
336 (d) of Code Section 29-4-14 and after a hearing at which other evidence may be presented.
337 The appointment of an emergency guardian is not appealable."
338 SECTION 12.
339 Said title is further amended in Code Section 29-5-1, relating to conservator for adults, best
340 interest of the adult, no presumption of need for conservator, and objective of
341 conservatorship, by adding a new paragraph to subsection (e) to read as follows:
342 "(3) An adult shall not be presumed to be in need of a conservator solely because of a
343 finding that the adult has one or more developmental disabilities as defined in paragraph
344 (8) of Code Section 37-1-1."
- 14 -

25 LC 44 3193ERS
345 SECTION 13.
346 Said title is further amended in Code Section 29-5-10, relating to petition for appointment
347 of conservator and requirements of petition, by revising paragraph (1) of subsection (c) as
348 follows:
349 "(c)(1) The petition shall be sworn to by two or more petitioners or shall be supported
350 by an affidavit of a physician licensed to practice medicine under Chapter 34 of Title 43,
351 a psychologist licensed to practice under Chapter 39 of Title 43, a physician assistant
352 licensed under Chapter 34 of Title 43, a nurse practitioner or clinical nurse specialist in
353 psychiatric/mental health licensed or registered under Chapter 26 of Title 43, a marriage
354 and family therapist or professional counselor licensed under Chapter 10A of Title 43,
355 or a licensed clinical social worker, or, if the proposed ward is a patient in any federal
356 medical facility in which such a physician, psychologist, or physician assistant, nurse
357 practitioner, clinical nurse specialist in psychiatric/mental health, marriage and family
358 therapist, professional counselor, or licensed clinical social worker is not available, a
359 physician, psychologist, or physician assistant, nurse practitioner, clinical nurse specialist
360 in psychiatric/mental health, marriage and family therapist, professional counselor, or
361 licensed clinical social worker authorized to practice in that such federal facility."
362 SECTION 14.
363 Said title is further amended in Code Section 29-5-11, relating to prerequisite finding prior
364 to appointment of conservator, notice, evaluation, and written report, by revising
365 subsection (d) as follows:
366 "(d)(1) If the petition is not dismissed pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section, the
367 court shall appoint an evaluating physician evaluator who shall be a physician licensed
368 to practice medicine under Chapter 34 of Title 43, a psychologist licensed to practice
369 under Chapter 39 of Title 43, a physician assistant licensed under Chapter 34 of Title 43,
370 a nurse practitioner or clinical nurse specialist in psychiatric/mental health licensed or
- 15 -

25 LC 44 3193ERS
371 registered under Chapter 26 of Title 43, a marriage and family therapist or professional
372 counselor licensed under Chapter 10A of Title 43, or a licensed clinical social worker, or,
373 if the proposed ward is a patient in any federal medical facility in which such a physician,
374 psychologist, or physician assistant, nurse practitioner, clinical nurse specialist in
375 psychiatric/mental health, marriage and family therapist, professional counselor, or
376 licensed clinical social worker is not available, a physician, psychologist, or physician
377 assistant, nurse practitioner, clinical nurse specialist in psychiatric/mental health,
378 marriage and family therapist, professional counselor, or licensed clinical social worker
379 authorized to practice in that such federal facility other than the physician, psychologist,
380 or physician assistant, nurse practitioner, clinical nurse specialist in psychiatric/mental
381 health, marriage and family therapist, professional counselor, or licensed clinical social
382 worker who completed the affidavit attached to the petition pursuant to subsection (c) of
383 Code Section 29-5-10.
384 (2) When evaluating the proposed ward, the physician, psychologist, or physician
385 assistant, nurse practitioner, clinical nurse specialist in psychiatric/mental health,
386 marriage and family therapist, professional counselor, or licensed clinical social worker
387 shall explain the purpose of the evaluation to the proposed ward. The proposed ward may
388 remain silent. Any statements made by the proposed ward during the evaluation shall be
389 privileged and shall be inadmissable as evidence in any proceeding other than a
390 proceeding under this chapter. The proposed ward's legal counsel shall have the right to
391 be present but shall not participate in the evaluation.
392 (3) The evaluation shall be conducted with as little interference with the proposed ward's
393 activities as possible. The evaluation shall take place at the place and time set in the
394 notice to the proposed ward and to his or her legal counsel and the time set shall not be
395 sooner than the fifth day after the service of notice on the proposed ward. The court,
396 however, shall have the exclusive power to change the place and time of the examination
397 at any time upon reasonable notice being given to the proposed ward and to his or her
- 16 -

25 LC 44 3193ERS
398 legal counsel. If the proposed ward fails to appear, the court may order that the proposed
399 ward be taken directly to and from a medical facility, office of a physician, psychologist,
400 or physician assistant, nurse practitioner, clinical nurse specialist in psychiatric/mental
401 health, marriage and family therapist, professional counselor, or licensed clinical social
402 worker for purposes of evaluation only. The evaluation shall be conducted during the
403 normal business hours of the facility or office, and the proposed ward shall not be
404 detained in the facility or office overnight. The evaluation may include, but not be
405 limited to:
406 (A) A self-report from the proposed ward, if possible;
407 (B) Questions and observations of the proposed ward to assess the functional abilities
408 of the proposed ward;
409 (C) A review of the records for the proposed ward, including, but not limited to,
410 medical records, medication charts, and other available records;
411 (D) An assessment of cultural factors and language barriers that may impact the
412 proposed ward's abilities and living environment; and
413 (E) All other factors the evaluator determines to be appropriate to the evaluation.
414 (4) A written report shall be filed with the court no later than seven days after the
415 evaluation, and the court shall serve a copy of the report by first-class mail upon the
416 proposed ward and the proposed ward's legal counsel and guardian ad litem, if appointed.
417 (5) The report shall be signed under oath by the physician, psychologist, or licensed
418 clinical social worker evaluator and shall:
419 (A) State the circumstances and duration of the evaluation, including a summary of
420 questions or tests utilized, and the elements of the evaluation;
421 (B) List all persons and other sources of information consulted in evaluating the
422 proposed ward;
- 17 -

25 LC 44 3193ERS
423 (C) Describe the proposed ward's mental and physical state and condition, including
424 all observed facts considered by the physician, psychologist, or licensed clinical social
425 worker evaluator;
426 (D) Describe the overall social condition of the proposed ward, including support, care,
427 education, and well-being; and
428 (E) Describe the needs of the proposed ward and their foreseeable duration.
429 (6) The proposed ward's legal counsel may file a written response to the evaluation,
430 provided the response is filed no later than the date of the commencement of the hearing
431 on the petition for conservatorship. The response may include, but is not limited to,
432 independent evaluations, affidavits of individuals with personal knowledge of the
433 proposed ward, and a statement of applicable law. In the response, the proposed ward's
434 legal counsel may also challenge the sufficiency and weight of the results and
435 conclusions of the evaluation and written report and the qualifications, experience, or
436 abilities of the person performing the evaluation."
437 SECTION 15.
438 Said title is further amended in Code Section 29-5-12, relating to judicial review and
439 proceedings, by revising subsection (d) as follows:
440 (d)(1) The hearing shall be held in a courtroom or, for good cause shown, at any other
441 place as the court may set. At the request of the proposed ward or the proposed ward's
442 legal counsel and for good cause shown, the court may exercise its discretion to exclude
443 the public from the hearing and the record shall reflect the court's action. The proposed
444 ward or the proposed ward's legal counsel may waive the appearance of the proposed
445 ward at the hearing.
446 (2) The hearing shall be recorded by either a certified court reporter or a sound-recording
447 device. The recording shall be retained for not less than 45 days from the date of the
448 entry of the order described in Code Section 29-5-138.
- 18 -

25 LC 44 3193ERS
449 (3) The court shall apply the rules of evidence applicable in civil cases.
450 (4) At the hearing, the proposed ward may also challenge, by appropriate evidence and
451 argument, the sufficiency and weight of the results and conclusions of the evaluation and
452 written report and the qualifications, experience, or abilities of the person performing the
453 evaluation. The proposed ward shall have the right to present such evidence and
454 argument regardless of whether the proposed ward's legal counsel raised such matters in
455 a written response submitted by the proposed ward's legal counsel pursuant to
456 paragraph (6) of subsection (d) of Code Section 29-5-11.
457 (5) The court shall utilize the criteria in Code Section 29-5-1 to determine whether there
458 is clear and convincing evidence of the need for a conservatorship in light of the evidence
459 taken at the hearing. In addition to the evidence at the hearing, the court may consider
460 the evaluation report and any response filed by the proposed ward. The burden of proof
461 shall be upon the petitioner.
462 (6) If the court finds that the proposed ward has one or more developmental disabilities
463 as defined in paragraph (8) of Code Section 37-1-1, the court shall not find that there is
464 a need for a conservatorship unless the evidence shows by clear and convincing evidence
465 that, due to such developmental disability or disabilities and other factors that may be
466 present, the proposed ward lacks sufficient capacity to make or communicate significant
467 responsible decisions concerning the management of his or her property.
468 (5)(7) Upon determination of the need for a conservatorship, the court shall determine
469 the powers, if any, which are to be retained by the proposed ward, in accordance with the
470 provisions of Code Section 29-5-21 and whether any additional powers shall be granted
471 to the conservator pursuant to the provisions of subsections (b) and (c) of Code
472 Section 29-5-23.
473 (6)(8) If the court determines that a conservatorship is necessary and the proposed ward
474 is present, the proposed ward may suggest any person as conservator. The court shall
475 select as conservator the person who shall serve the best interest of the ward.
- 19 -

25 LC 44 3193ERS
476 (7)(9) In any procedure under this chapter in which the judge of the court is unable to
477 hear a case within the time required for a hearing on the petition for conservatorship, the
478 judge shall appoint an individual to serve to hear the case and exercise all the jurisdiction
479 of the court in the case. Any individual so appointed shall be a member of the State Bar
480 of Georgia who is qualified to serve as the probate judge in that county and who is, in the
481 opinion of the appointing judge, qualified for the duties by training and experience. The
482 appointment may be made on a case-by-case basis or by making a standing appointment
483 of one or more individuals. Any individual who receives a standing appointment shall
484 serve at the pleasure of the judge who makes the appointment or the judge's successor in
485 office. The compensation of an individual so appointed shall be as agreed upon by the
486 judge who makes the appointment and the individual appointed, with the approval of the
487 governing authority of the county for which the individual is appointed, and shall be paid
488 from county funds. All fees collected for the service of the appointed individual shall be
489 paid into the general funds of the county."
490 SECTION 16.
491 Said title is further amended in Code Section 29-5-14, relating to appointment of emergency
492 conservator and requirements of petition, by revising paragraph (1) of subsection (d) as
493 follows:
494 "(d)(1) The petition shall be sworn to by two or more petitioners or shall be supported
495 by an affidavit of a physician licensed to practice medicine under Chapter 34 of Title 43,
496 a psychologist licensed to practice under Chapter 39 of Title 43, a physician assistant
497 licensed under Chapter 34 of Title 43, a nurse practitioner or clinical nurse specialist in
498 psychiatric/mental health licensed or registered under Chapter 26 of Title 43, a marriage
499 and family therapist or professional counselor licensed under Chapter 10A of Title 43,
500 or a licensed clinical social worker, or, if the proposed ward is a patient in any federal
501 medical facility in which such a physician, psychologist, or physician assistant, nurse
- 20 -

25 LC 44 3193ERS
502 practitioner, clinical nurse specialist in psychiatric/mental health, marriage and family
503 therapist, professional counselor, or licensed clinical social worker is not available, a
504 physician, psychologist, or physician assistant, nurse practitioner, clinical nurse specialist
505 in psychiatric/mental health, marriage and family therapist, professional counselor, or
506 licensed clinical social worker authorized to practice in that such federal facility."
507 SECTION 17.
508 Said title is further amended in Code Section 29-5-15, relating to review of petition,
509 dismissal, and requirements of court upon finding need for emergency conservator, by
510 revising subsection (c) as follows:
511 "(c) If the court determines that there is probable cause to believe that the proposed ward
512 is in need of an emergency conservator, the court shall:
513 (1) Immediately appoint legal counsel to represent the proposed ward at the emergency
514 hearing, which counsel may be the same counsel who is appointed to represent the
515 proposed ward in the hearing on the petition for guardianship or conservatorship, if any
516 such petition has been filed, and shall inform counsel of the appointment;
517 (2) Order an emergency hearing to be conducted not sooner than three days nor later than
518 five days after the filing of the petition;
519 (3) Order an evaluation of the proposed ward by a physician an evaluator who shall be
520 a physician licensed to practice medicine under Chapter 34 of Title 43, a psychologist
521 licensed to practice under Chapter 39 of Title 43, a physician assistant licensed under
522 Chapter 34 of Title 43, a nurse practitioner or clinical nurse specialist in
523 psychiatric/mental health licensed or registered under Chapter 26 of Title 43, a marriage
524 and family therapist or professional counselor licensed under Chapter 10A of Title 43,
525 or a licensed clinical social worker, other than the physician, psychologist, or physician
526 assistant, nurse practitioner, clinical nurse specialist in psychiatric/mental health,
527 marriage and family therapist, professional counselor, or licensed clinical social worker
- 21 -

25 LC 44 3193ERS
528 who completed the affidavit attached to the petition pursuant to paragraph (1) of
529 subsection (d) of Code Section 29-5-10, to. Such evaluation shall be conducted within
530 72 hours of the time such order was issued, and a written report to shall be furnished to
531 the court and made available to the parties within 72 hours such time, which evaluation
532 and report shall be governed by the provisions of subsection (d) of Code
533 Section 29-5-14 29-5-11;
534 (4) Immediately notify the proposed ward of the proceedings by service of all pleadings
535 on the proposed ward, which notice shall:
536 (A) Be served personally on the proposed ward by an officer of the court and shall not
537 be served by mail;
538 (B) Inform the proposed ward that a petition has been filed to have an emergency
539 conservator appointed for the proposed ward, that the proposed ward has the right to
540 attend any hearing that is held, and that, if an emergency conservator is appointed, the
541 proposed ward may lose important rights to control the management of the proposed
542 ward's property;
543 (C) Inform the proposed ward of the place and time at which the proposed ward shall
544 submit to the evaluation provided for by paragraph (3) of this subsection;
545 (D) Inform the proposed ward of the appointment of legal counsel; and
546 (E) Inform the proposed ward of the date and time of the hearing on the emergency
547 conservatorship; and
548 (5) Appoint an emergency conservator to serve until the emergency hearing, with or
549 without prior notice to the proposed ward, if the threatened risk is so immediate and the
550 potential harm so irreparable that any delay is unreasonable and the existence of the
551 threatened risk and potential for irreparable harm is certified by the affidavit of a
552 physician licensed to practice medicine under Chapter 34 of Title 43, a psychologist
553 licensed to practice under Chapter 39 of Title 43, a physician assistant licensed under
554 Chapter 34 of Title 43, a nurse practitioner or clinical nurse specialist in
- 22 -

25 LC 44 3193ERS
555 psychiatric/mental health licensed or registered under Chapter 26 of Title 43, a marriage
556 and family therapist or professional counselor licensed under Chapter 10A of Title 43,
557 or a licensed clinical social worker; provided, however, that, pending the emergency
558 hearing, the court shall order that no withdrawals may be made from any account on the
559 authority of the proposed ward's signature without the court's prior approval and that the
560 emergency conservator shall not expend any funds of the proposed ward without prior
561 court approval. Appointment of an emergency conservator under this paragraph is not
562 a final determination of the proposed ward's need for a nonemergency conservator. Any
563 emergency conservator appointed under this paragraph shall have only those powers and
564 duties specifically enumerated in the letters of emergency conservatorship; such powers
565 and duties shall not exceed those absolutely necessary to respond to the immediate
566 threatened risk to the ward; and such powers and duties shall be subject to the limitations
567 provided in this paragraph regarding the expenditures of funds of the ward."
568 SECTION 18.
569 Said title is further amended by revising Code Section 29-5-16, relating to emergency
570 conservatorship hearing and limitations on powers of emergency conservator, as follows:
571 "29-5-16.
572 (a) The court shall conduct the emergency conservatorship hearing at the time and date set
573 forth in its order to determine whether there is clear and convincing evidence of the need
574 for an emergency conservatorship in light of the evidence taken at the hearing. In addition
575 to the evidence at the hearing, the court may consider the evaluation report and any
576 response filed by the proposed ward. The proposed ward may also challenge, by
577 appropriate evidence and argument, the sufficiency and weight of the results and
578 conclusions of the evaluation and written report and the qualifications, experience, or
579 abilities of the person performing the evaluation. The burden of proof shall be upon the
- 23 -

25 LC 44 3193ERS
580 petitioner. Upon the consent of the petitioner and the proposed ward, the court may grant
581 a continuance of the case for a period not to exceed 30 days.
582 (b) If the court at the emergency hearing finds that an emergency conservatorship is
583 necessary, the court shall order the emergency conservatorship; provided, however, that:
584 (1) Any emergency conservator shall have only those powers and duties specifically
585 enumerated in the letters of emergency conservatorship and the powers and duties shall
586 not exceed those absolutely necessary to respond to the immediate threatened risk to the
587 ward;
588 (2) The court may order the emergency conservator to make any report the court
589 requires;
590 (3) If the court finds that the proposed ward has one or more developmental disabilities
591 as defined in paragraph (8) of Code Section 37-1-1, the court shall not find that there is
592 a need for an emergency conservatorship unless the evidence shows by clear and
593 convincing evidence that, due to such developmental disability or disabilities and other
594 factors that may be present, the proposed ward lacks sufficient capacity to make or
595 communicate significant responsible decisions concerning the management of his or her
596 property and there is an immediate and substantial risk of irreparable waste or dissipation
597 of the proposed ward's property unless an emergency conservator is appointed; and
598 (3)(4) The emergency conservatorship shall terminate on the earliest of:
599 (A) The court's removal of the emergency conservator, with or without cause;
600 (B) The effective date of the appointment of a conservator;
601 (C) Unless otherwise specified in the order of dismissal, the dismissal of a petition for
602 appointment of a conservator;
603 (D) The date specified for the termination in the order appointing the emergency
604 conservator; or
605 (E) Sixty days from the date of appointment of the emergency conservator."
- 24 -

25 LC 44 3193ERS
606 SECTION 19.
607 Said title is further amended in Code Section 29-5-23, relating to authority of conservator
608 and cooperation with guardian or other interested parties, by revising paragraph (13) of
609 subsection (a) and paragraph (5) of subsection (c) as follows:
610 "(13) Compromise any contested or doubtful claim for or against the ward if the
611 proposed gross settlement as defined in Code Section 29-3-3 is in the amount
612 of $25,000.00 or less, provided that, for purposes of this paragraph, the term 'gross
613 settlement' means the present value of all amounts paid or to be paid in settlement of the
614 claim, including cash, medical expenses, expenses of litigation, attorney's fees, and any
615 amounts allocated to a structured settlement or other similar financial arrangement; and"
616 "(5) To compromise a contested or doubtful claim for or against the ward if the proposed
617 gross settlement as defined in Code Section 29-3-3 is more than $25,000.00, provided
618 that, for purposes of this paragraph, the term 'gross settlement' means the present value
619 of all amounts paid or to be paid in settlement of the claim, including cash, medical
620 expenses, expenses of litigation, attorney's fees, and any amounts allocated to a structured
621 settlement or other similar financial arrangement;"
622 SECTION 20.
623 Said title is further amended in Code Section 29-5-71, relating to modification of
624 conservatorship, contents of petition for modification, and burden of proof, by revising
625 subsection (b) as follows:
626 "(b) If the petition for modification alleges a significant change in the capacity of the ward,
627 it must be supported either by the affidavits of two persons who have knowledge of the
628 ward, one of whom may be the petitioner, or of a physician licensed to practice medicine
629 under Chapter 34 of Title 43, a psychologist licensed to practice under Chapter 39 of Title
630 43, a physician assistant licensed under Chapter 34 of Title 43, a nurse practitioner or
631 clinical nurse specialist in psychiatric/mental health licensed or registered under Chapter 26
- 25 -

25 LC 44 3193ERS
632 of Title 43, a marriage and family therapist or professional counselor licensed under
633 Chapter 10A of Title 43, or a licensed clinical social worker, setting forth the supporting
634 facts and determinations. If, after reviewing the petition and the affidavits, the court
635 determines that there is no probable cause to believe that there has been a significant
636 change in the capacity of the ward, the court shall dismiss the petition. If the petition is not
637 dismissed, the court shall order that an evaluation be conducted, in accordance with the
638 provisions of subsection (d) of Code Section 29-5-11. If, after reviewing the evaluation
639 report, the court finds that there is no probable cause to believe that there has been a
640 significant change in the capacity of the ward, the court shall dismiss the petition. If the
641 petition is not dismissed, the court shall schedule a hearing, with such notice as the court
642 deems appropriate."
643 SECTION 21.
644 Said title is further amended in Code Section 29-5-72, relating to termination of
645 conservatorship, required evidence to support, burden of proof, and death of ward, by
646 revising subsection (b) as follows:
647 "(b) A petition for termination must be supported either by the affidavits of two persons
648 who have knowledge of the ward, one of whom may be the petitioner, or of a physician
649 licensed to practice medicine under Chapter 34 of Title 43, a psychologist licensed to
650 practice under Chapter 39 of Title 43, a physician assistant licensed under Chapter 34 of
651 Title 43, a nurse practitioner or clinical nurse specialist in psychiatric/mental health
652 licensed or registered under Chapter 26 of Title 43, a marriage and family therapist or
653 professional counselor licensed under Chapter 10A of Title 43, or a licensed clinical social
654 worker, setting forth the supporting facts and determinations. If, after reviewing the
655 petition and the affidavits, the court determines that there is no probable cause to believe
656 that the conservatorship should be terminated, the court shall dismiss the petition. If the
657 petition is not dismissed, the court shall order that an evaluation be conducted in
- 26 -

25 LC 44 3193ERS
658 accordance with the provisions of subsection (d) of Code Section 29-5-11. If, after
659 reviewing the evaluation report, the court finds that there is no probable cause to believe
660 that the conservatorship should be terminated, the court shall dismiss the petition. If the
661 petition is not dismissed, the court shall schedule a hearing with such notice as the court
662 deems appropriate."
663 SECTION 22.
664 Said title is further amended in Code Section 29-5-110, relating to proceedings for appeal,
665 appointment of guardians ad litem, bond and security prior to removal, liability of surety of
666 predecessor conservator, and jurisdiction, by revising subsection (d) as follows:
667 "(d) Pending any appeal, the superior court or a probate court that is described in
668 paragraph (2) of Code Section 15-9-120 may appoint an emergency conservator with
669 powers and duties as are described in Code Section 29-5-16; provided, however, that such
670 emergency conservator may be appointed only upon the filing of an affidavit of a physician
671 licensed to practice medicine under Chapter 34 of Title 43, a psychologist licensed to
672 practice under Chapter 39 of Title 43, a physician assistant licensed under Chapter 34 of
673 Title 43, a nurse practitioner or clinical nurse specialist in psychiatric/mental health
674 licensed or registered under Chapter 26 of Title 43, a marriage and family therapist or
675 professional counselor licensed under Chapter 10A of Title 43, or a licensed clinical social
676 worker, setting forth the existence of the emergency circumstances described in
677 subsection (d) of Code Section 29-5-14 and after a hearing at which other evidence may
678 be presented. The appointment of an emergency conservator is not appealable."
679 SECTION 23.
680 Said title is further amended by revising Code Section 29-9-16, relating to compensation to
681 physicians, psychologists, or licensed clinical social workers, as follows:
- 27 -

25 LC 44 3193ERS
682 "29-9-16.
683 (a) For the evaluation or examination required by subsection (d) of Code Section 29-4-11,
684 subsection (c) of Code Section 29-4-15, subsection (b) of Code Section 29-4-42,
685 subsection (d) of Code Section 29-5-11, subsection (c) of Code Section 29-5-15, or
686 subsection (b) of Code Section 29-5-71, the evaluating physician, psychologist, or
687 physician assistant, nurse practitioner, clinical nurse specialist in psychiatric/mental health,
688 marriage and family therapist, professional counselor, or licensed clinical social worker
689 shall receive a reasonable fee commensurate with the task performed, plus actual expenses.
690 (b) In the event the attendance of the evaluating physician, psychologist, or physician
691 assistant, nurse practitioner, clinical nurse specialist in psychiatric/mental health, marriage
692 and family therapist, professional counselor, or licensed clinical social worker shall be
693 required by the court for a hearing under subsection (d) of Code Section 29-4-12,
694 subsection (a) of Code Section 29-4-16, subsection (b) of Code Section 29-4-42, subsection
695 (d) of Code Section 29-5-12, subsection (a) of Code Section 29-5-16, or subsection (b) of
696 Code Section 29-5-71, other than pursuant to a subpoena requested by a party to the
697 proceeding, the evaluating physician, psychologist, or physician assistant, nurse
698 practitioner, clinical nurse specialist in psychiatric/mental health, marriage and family
699 therapist, professional counselor, or licensed clinical social worker shall receive a
700 reasonable fee commensurate with the task performed, plus actual expenses.
701 (c) All fees and expenses payable under subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section shall be
702 assessed by the court and paid in accordance with the provisions of Code Section 29-9-3."
703 SECTION 24.
704 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
- 28 -